languagetool-language-modules/ti/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ti/hunspell/ti.aff
SET UTF-8

TRY ሀሁሂሃሄህሆሇለሉሊላሌልሎሏሐሑሒሓሔሕሖሗመሙሚማሜምሞሟሠሡሢሣሤሥሦሧረሩሪራሬርሮሯሰሱሲሳሴስሶሷሸሹሺሻሼሽሾሿቀቁቂቃቄቅቆቇቈ቉ቊቋቌቍ቎቏ቐቑቒቓቔቕቖ቗ቘ቙ቚቛቜቝ቞቟በቡቢባቤብቦቧቨቩቪቫቬቭቮቯተቱቲታቴትቶቷቸቹቺቻቼችቾቿኀኁኂኃኄኅኆኇኈ኉ኊኋኌኍ኎኏ነኑኒናኔንኖኗኘኙኚኛኜኝኞኟአኡኢኣኤእኦኧከኩኪካኬክኮኯኰ኱ኲኳኴኵ኶኷ኸኹኺኻኼኽኾ኿ዀ዁ዂዃዄዅ዆዇ወዉዊዋዌውዎዏዐዑዒዓዔዕዖ዗ዘዙዚዛዜዝዞዟዠዡዢዣዤዥዦዧየዩዪያዬይዮዯደዱዲዳዴድዶዷዸዹዺዻዼዽዾዿጀጁጂጃጄጅጆጇገጉጊጋጌግጎጏጐ጑ጒጓጔጕ጖጗ጘጙጚጛጜጝጞጟጠጡጢጣጤጥጦጧጨጩጪጫጬጭጮጯጰጱጲጳጴጵጶጷጸጹጺጻጼጽጾጿፀፁፂፃፄፅፆፇፈፉፊፋፌፍፎፏፐፑፒፓፔፕፖፗፘፙፚሀሁሂሃሄህሆሇለሉሊላሌልሎሏሐሑሒሓሔሕሖሗመሙሚማሜምሞሟሠሡሢሣሤሥሦሧረሩሪራሬርሮሯሰሱሲሳሴስሶሷሸሹሺሻሼሽሾሿቀቁቂቃቄቅቆቇቈ቉ቊቋቌቍ቎቏ቐቑቒቓቔቕቖ቗ቘ቙ቚቛቜቝ቞቟በቡቢባቤብቦቧቨቩቪቫቬቭቮቯተቱቲታቴትቶቷቸቹቺቻቼችቾቿኀኁኂኃኄኅኆኇኈ኉ኊኋኌኍ኎኏ነኑኒናኔንኖኗኘኙኚኛኜኝኞኟአኡኢኣኤእኦኧከኩኪካኬክኮኯኰ኱ኲኳኴኵ኶኷ኸኹኺኻኼኽኾ኿ዀ዁ዂዃዄዅ዆዇ወዉዊዋዌውዎዏዐዑዒዓዔዕዖ዗ዘዙዚዛዜዝዞዟዠዡዢዣዤዥዦዧየዩዪያዬይዮዯደዱዲዳዴድዶዷዸዹዺዻዼዽዾዿጀጁጂጃጄጅጆጇገጉጊጋጌግጎጏጐ጑ጒጓጔጕ጖጗ጘጙጚጛጜጝጞጟጠጡጢጣጤጥጦጧጨጩጪጫጬጭጮጯጰጱጲጳጴጵጶጷጸጹጺጻጼጽጾጿፀፁፂፃፄፅፆፇፈፉፊፋፌፍፎፏፐፑፒፓፔፕፖፗፘፙፚሀሁሂሃሄህሆሇለሉሊላሌልሎሏሐሑሒሓሔሕሖሗመሙሚማሜምሞሟሠሡሢሣሤሥሦሧረሩሪራሬርሮሯሰሱሲሳሴስሶሷሸሹሺሻሼሽሾሿቀቁቂቃቄቅቆቇቈ቉ቊቋቌቍ቎቏ቐቑቒቓቔቕቖ቗ቘ቙ቚቛቜቝ቞቟በቡቢባቤብቦቧቨቩቪቫቬቭቮቯተቱቲታቴትቶቷቸቹቺቻቼችቾቿኀኁኂኃኄኅኆኇኈ኉ኊኋኌኍ኎኏ነኑኒናኔንኖኗኘኙኚኛኜኝኞኟአኡኢኣኤእኦኧከኩኪካኬክኮኯኰ኱ኲኳኴኵ኶኷ኸኹኺኻኼኽኾ኿ዀ዁ዂዃዄዅ዆዇ወዉዊዋዌውዎዏዐዑዒዓዔዕዖ዗ዘዙዚዛዜዝዞዟዠዡዢዣዤዥዦዧየዩዪያዬይዮዯደዱዲዳዴድዶዷዸዹዺዻዼዽዾዿጀጁጂጃጄጅጆጇገጉጊጋጌግጎጏጐ጑ጒጓጔጕ጖጗ጘጙጚጛጜጝጞጟጠጡጢጣጤጥጦጧጨጩጪጫጬጭጮጯጰጱጲጳጴጵጶጷጸጹጺጻጼጽጾጿፀፁፂፃፄፅፆፇፈፉፊፋፌፍፎፏፐፑፒፓፔፕፖፗፘፙፚሀሁሂሃሄህሆሇለሉሊላሌልሎሏሐሑሒሓሔሕሖሗመሙሚማሜምሞሟሠሡሢሣሤሥሦሧረሩሪራሬርሮሯሰሱሲሳሴስሶሷሸሹሺሻሼሽሾሿቀቁቂቃቄቅቆቇቈ቉ቊቋቌቍ቎቏ቐቑቒቓቔቕቖ቗ቘ቙ቚቛቜቝ቞቟በቡቢባቤብቦቧቨቩቪቫቬቭቮቯተቱቲታቴትቶቷቸቹቺቻቼችቾቿኀኁኂኃኄኅኆኇኈ኉ኊኋኌኍ኎኏ነኑኒናኔንኖኗኘኙኚኛኜኝኞኟአኡኢኣኤእኦኧከኩኪካኬክኮኯኰ኱ኲኳኴኵ኶኷ኸኹኺኻኼኽኾ኿ዀ዁ዂዃዄዅ዆዇ወዉዊዋዌውዎዏዐዑዒዓዔዕዖ዗ዘዙዚዛዜዝዞዟዠዡዢዣዤዥዦዧየዩዪያዬይዮዯደዱዲዳዴድዶዷዸዹዺዻዼዽዾዿጀጁጂጃጄጅጆጇገጉጊጋጌግጎጏጐ጑ጒጓጔጕ጖጗ጘጙጚጛጜጝጞጟጠጡጢጣጤጥጦጧጨጩጪጫጬጭጮጯጰጱጲጳጴጵጶጷጸጹጺጻጼጽጾጿፀፁፂፃፄፅፆፇፈፉፊፋፌፍፎፏፐፑፒፓፔፕፖፗፘፙፚ
PFX A Y 1
PFX A 0 ዝ

PFX B Y 1
PFX B 0 ክ

PFX C Y 1
PFX C 0 ል

PFX D Y 1
PFX D 0 ከኢ

CIRCUMFIX E

PFX F Y 1
PFX F 0 ኣይ/E

SFX G Y 1
SFX G 0 ን/EF
