languagetool-language-modules/ti/src/main/resources/org/languagetool/resource/ti/hunspell/ti.dic
15
መዘነ/ABCG
መወፀ/ABCG
መወሰ/ABCG
መወለ/ABCG
መዀደ/ABCG
መኸኸ/ABCG
መኸነ/ABCG
መኸረ/ABCG
መከተ/ABCG
መንጨተ/ABCG
በጠሰ/ABCG
መንጠለ/ABCG
መንጐደ/ABCG
መንገገ/ABCG
መንዝዐ/ABCG
